Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1107.01
Director of Administrative Services; accountant; record keeper.

The Director of Administrative Services is declared to be the general accountant of the state, and the keeper of all public accounts books, accounts, vouchers, documents, and all papers relating to the accounts and contracts of the state, and its revenue, debt and fiscal affairs, not required by law to be placed in some other office or kept by some other officer or person.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 2, p. 19;

R.S.1913, § 5544;

C.S.1922, § 4846;

C.S.1929, § 84-302;

R.S.1943, § 84-302;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-302.

Under former act, Auditor of Public Accounts was necessary party to declaratory judgment action testing constitutionality of statute. Haynes v. Anderson, 163 Neb. 50, 77 N.W.2d 674 (1956).

The Auditor of Public Accounts represents the state in settlements between the State Treasurer and county treasurers. State v. Ure, 102 Neb. 648, 168 N.W. 644 (1918).